Missouri, session 2026, HB2742.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 302.302 and 304.070, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.3300, 302.302, and 304.070, to read as
follows:
160.3300. School districts may install and operate school bus safety cameras on
school buses to be used for the detection of violations of section 304.050, provided that
such use is approved by a vote of the school district board of directors. Any image or
video recorded by a school bus safety camera that is not used for the purpose of
enforcing violations of section 304.050 shall be permanently deleted no later than one-
hundred-eighty days from the date of capture. For purposes of this section, "school bus
safety camera" means a device that is affixed to a school bus that records photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images of the front or rear of a vehicle at the time the
vehicle is detected for an infraction identified in section 304.050.
302.302. 1. The director of revenue shall put into effect a point system for the
suspension and revocation of licenses. Points shall be assessed only after a conviction or
forfeiture of collateral. The initial point value is as follows:
(1) Any moving violation of a state law or county or
municipal or federal traffic ordinance or regulation
not listed in this section, other than a violation of 2 points
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2742 2
vehicle equipment provisions or a court-ordered
supervision as provided in section 302.303
(except any violation of municipal stop sign
ordinance where no accident is involved 1 point)
(2) Speeding
In violation of a state law 3 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(3) Leaving the scene of an accident in violation of
section 577.060 12 points
In violation of any county or municipal ordinance 6 points
(4) Careless and imprudent driving in violation of
subsection 4 of section 304.016 4 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(5) Operating without a valid license in violation of
subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of section
302.020:
(a) For the first conviction 2 points
(b) For the second conviction 4 points
(c) For the third conviction 6 points
(6) Operating with a suspended or revoked license prior
to restoration of operating privileges 12 points
(7) Obtaining a license by misrepresentation 12 points
(8) For the first conviction of driving while in an
intoxicated condition or under the influence of
controlled substances or drugs 8 points
(9) For the second or subsequent conviction of any of
the following offenses however combined: driving
while in an intoxicated condition, driving under the
influence of controlled substances or drugs or
driving with a blood alcohol content of eight-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight 12 points
(10) For the first conviction for driving with blood
alcohol content eight-hundredths of one percent or
more by weight
In violation of state law 8 points

HCS HB 2742 3
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance or
federal law or regulation 8 points
(11) Any felony involving the use of a motor vehicle 12 points
(12) Knowingly permitting unlicensed operator to
operate a motor vehicle 4 points
(13) For a conviction for failure to maintain financial
responsibility pursuant to county or municipal
ordinance or pursuant to section 303.025 4 points
(14) Endangerment of a highway worker in violation of
section 304.585 4 points
(15) Aggravated endangerment of a highway worker in
violation of section 304.585 12 points
(16) For a conviction of violating a municipal ordinance
that prohibits tow truck operators from stopping at
or proceeding to the scene of an accident unless they
have been requested to stop or proceed to such
scene by a party involved in such accident or by an
officer of a public safety agency 4 points
(17) Endangerment of an emergency responder in
violation of section 304.894 4 points
(18) Aggravated endangerment of an emergency
responder in violation of section 304.894 12 points
(19) Failure to stop for a school bus that is receiving
or discharging students, in violation of
subsection 1 of section 304.050 5 points
2. The director shall, as provided in subdivision (5) of subsection 1 of this section,
assess an operator points for a conviction pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
section 302.020, when the director issues such operator a license or permit pursuant to the
provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.340.
3. An additional two points shall be assessed when personal injury or property
damage results from any violation listed in subdivisions (1) to (13) of subsection 1 of this
section and if found to be warranted and certified by the reporting court.
4. When any of the acts listed in subdivision (2), (3), (4) or (8) of subsection 1 of this
section constitutes both a violation of a state law and a violation of a county or municipal
ordinance, points may be assessed for either violation but not for both. Notwithstanding that
an offense arising out of the same occurrence could be construed to be a violation of

HCS HB 2742 4
subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection 1 of this section, no person shall be tried or
convicted for more than one offense pursuant to subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection 1
of this section for offenses arising out of the same occurrence.
5. The director of revenue shall put into effect a system for staying the assessment of
points against an operator. The system shall provide that the satisfactory completion of a
driver-improvement program or, in the case of violations committed while operating a
motorcycle, a motorcycle-rider training course approved by the state highways and
transportation commission, by an operator, when so ordered and verified by any court
having jurisdiction over any law of this state or county or municipal ordinance, regulating
motor vehicles, other than a violation committed in a commercial motor vehicle as defined in
section 302.700 or a violation committed by an individual who has been issued a commercial
driver's license or is required to obtain a commercial driver's license in this state or any other
state, shall be accepted by the director in lieu of the assessment of points for a violation
pursuant to subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection 1 of this section or pursuant to subsection
3 of this section. The operator shall be given the option to complete the driver-improvement
program through an online or in-person course. A court using a centralized violation bureau
established under section 476.385 may elect to have the bureau order and verify completion
of a driver-improvement program or motorcycle-rider training course as prescribed by order
of the court. For the purposes of this subsection, the driver-improvement program shall meet
or exceed the standards of the National Safety Council's eight-hour "Defensive Driving
Course" or, in the case of a violation which occurred during the operation of a motorcycle, the
program shall meet the standards established by the state highways and transportation
100 commission pursuant to sections 302.133 to 302.137. The completion of a driver-
101 improvement program or a motorcycle-rider training course shall not be accepted in lieu of
102 points more than one time in any thirty-six-month period and shall be completed within sixty
103 days of the date of conviction in order to be accepted in lieu of the assessment of points.
104 Every court having jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall, within
105 fifteen days after completion of the driver-improvement program or motorcycle-rider training
106 course by an operator, forward a record of the completion to the director, all other provisions
107 of the law to the contrary notwithstanding. The director shall establish procedures for record
108 keeping and the administration of this subsection.
304.070. 1. Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsections 1, 3, and 7
of section 304.050 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. [In addition, the court may suspend
the driver's license of any person who violates the provision of subsection 1 of section
304.050. If ordered by the court, the director shall suspend the driver's license for ninety days
for a first offense of subsection 1 of section 304.050, and one hundred twenty days for a
second or subsequent offense of subsection 1 of section 304.050.] Any person who violates

HCS HB 2742 5
subsection 1 of section 304.050 where such violation results in the injury of any child shall be
guilty of a class E felony. Any person who violates subsection 1 of section 304.050 where
such violation causes the death of any child shall be guilty of a class D felony.
2. [Any appeal of a suspension imposed under subsection 1 of this section shall be a
direct appeal of the court order and subject to review by the presiding judge of the circuit
court or another judge within the circuit other than the judge who issued the original order to
suspend the driver's license. The director of revenue's entry of the court-ordered suspension
on the driving record is not a decision subject to review pursuant to section 302.311. Any
suspension of the driver's license ordered by the court under this section shall be in addition to
any other suspension that may occur as a result of the conviction pursuant to other provisions
of law] Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person found guilty of a
violation of subsection 1 of section 304.050 shall be subject to the following fines:
(1) For a first offense, a fine of at least five hundred dollars but not more than
one thousand dollars;
(2) For a second offense within a five-year period, a fine of at least one thousand
dollars but not more than two thousand dollars; and
(3) For a third or subsequent offense within a five-year period, a fine of at least
one thousand five hundred dollars but not more than three thousand dollars.

No court shall suspend any portion of the fines established under this subsection.
3. No violation of subsection 1 of section 304.050 shall be disposed of through the
state fine collection center or by payment of a fine without an appearance in open court.
The defendant shall appear in person or by attorney for disposition.
4. The driver's license of any person found guilty of a first violation of subsection
1 of section 304.050 may be suspended by the director of revenue, with such suspension
at the discretion of the court. The director of revenue shall suspend the driver's license
of any person found guilty of a violation of subsection 1 of section 304.050, as follows:
(1) For a second offense with a five-year period, ninety days; and
(2) For a third or subsequent offense within a five-year period, one-hundred-
eighty days.

Such suspensions shall be mandatory and shall be in addition to any other driver's
license suspension or revocation required or authorized under chapter 302.
5. The fines and suspensions required under subsections 2 and 4 of this section
shall apply to all violations of subsection 1 of section 304.050, including violations

HCS HB 2742 6
resulting in injury or death of a child, and shall be in addition to the penalties listed
under subsection 1 of this section.
✔